src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/for_liv_yaml_2023_08_17_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    aŗštõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aŗštõkstõ
    aŗštõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aŗštõkstõ
    aŗštõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aŗšt
    aŗštõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aŗšt
    aŗštõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aŗštõgid
    aŗštõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aŗštõgid
    aŗštõ+V+Jus+Sg3: aŗštõg
    aŗštõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: aŗštõg
    aŗštõ+V+Jus+Pl3: aŗštõgõd
    aŗštõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: aŗštõgõd
    aŗštõ+V+Quo+Sg3: aŗštiji
    aŗštõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: aŗštiji
    aŗštõ+V+Quo+Pl3: aŗštijid
    aŗštõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: aŗštijid
    aŗštõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aŗštõn
    aŗštõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aŗštõnd
    aŗštõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aŗštõd
    aŗštõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: aŗštõb
    aŗštõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: aŗštiji
    aŗštõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: aŗštimi
    
#"V_45":{"tips":"45","vards":"pȯrtõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"V","loc":{
    pȯrtõ+V+Inf: pȯrtõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Ger: pȯrtõs
    pȯrtõ+V+Sup: pȯrtõm
    pȯrtõ+V+Deb: pȯrtõmõst
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pūortõb
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pūortõd
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pūortõb
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pȯrtõm
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pȯrtõt
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pȯrtõbõd
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pūortiz
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pūortizt
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pūortiz
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pūortizmõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pūortizt, pūortiztõ]
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pūortizt, pūortiztõ]
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯrt
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: pȯrtõm
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: pȯrtõt
    pȯrtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: pȯrtõt
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Sg1: pȯrtõks
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Sg2: pȯrtõkst
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Sg3: pȯrtõks
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Pl1: pȯrtõksmõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Pl2: pȯrtõkstõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Pl3: pȯrtõkstõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: pȯrtõks
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: pȯrtõksmõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: pȯrtõkstõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: pȯrtõkstõ
    pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pȯrt
    pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: pȯrt
    pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pȯrtõgid
    pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: pȯrtõgid
    pȯrtõ+V+Jus+Sg3: pȯrtõg
    pȯrtõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: pȯrtõg
    pȯrtõ+V+Jus+Pl3: pȯrtõgõd
    pȯrtõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: pȯrtõgõd
    pȯrtõ+V+Quo+Sg3: pȯrtiji
    pȯrtõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: pȯrtiji
    pȯrtõ+V+Quo+Pl3: pȯrtijid
    pȯrtõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: pȯrtijid
    pȯrtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯrtõn
    pȯrtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: pȯrtõnd
    pȯrtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯrtõd
    pȯrtõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: pȯrtõb
    pȯrtõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: pȯrtiji
    pȯrtõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: pȯrtimi
    
#"V_46":{"tips":"46","vards":"outõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"V","loc":{
    outõ+V+Inf: outõ
    outõ+V+Ger: outõs
    outõ+V+Sup: outõm
    outõ+V+Deb: outõmõst
    outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ōtõb
    outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ōtõd
    outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ōtõb
    outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: outõm
    outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: outõt
    outõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: outõbõd
    outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ōtiz
    outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ōtizt
    outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ōtiz
    outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ōtizmõ
    outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ōtizt, ōtiztõ]
    outõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ōtizt, ōtiztõ]
    outõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: out
    outõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: outõm
    outõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: outõt
    outõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: outõt
    outõ+V+Cond+Sg1: outõks
    outõ+V+Cond+Sg2: outõkst
    outõ+V+Cond+Sg3: outõks
    outõ+V+Cond+Pl1: outõksmõ
    outõ+V+Cond+Pl2: outõkstõ
    outõ+V+Cond+Pl3: outõkstõ
    outõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: outõks
    outõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: outõksmõ
    outõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: outõkstõ
    outõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: outõkstõ
    outõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: out
    outõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: out
    outõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: outõgid
    outõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: outõgid
    outõ+V+Jus+Sg3: outõg
    outõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: outõg
    outõ+V+Jus+Pl3: outõgõd
    outõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: outõgõd
    outõ+V+Quo+Sg3: outiji
    outõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: outiji
    outõ+V+Quo+Pl3: outijid
    outõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: outijid
    outõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: outõn
    outõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: outõnd
    outõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: outõd
    outõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: outõb
    outõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: outiji
    outõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: outimi
    
#"V_47":{"tips":"47","vards":"tundõ","vcount":"66","bloks":"V","loc":{
    tundõ+V+Inf: tundõ
    tundõ+V+Ger: tundõs
    tundõ+V+Sup: tundõm
    tundõ+V+Deb: tundõmõst
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tūndõb
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tūndõd
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tūndõb
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tundõm
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tundõt
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tundõbõd
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tūndiz
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tūndizt
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tūndiz
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tūndizmõ
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tūndizt, tūndiztõ]
    tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tūndizt, tūndiztõ]
    tundõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tund
    tundõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: tundõm
    tundõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: tundõt
    tundõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: tundõt
    tundõ+V+Cond+Sg1: tundõks
    tundõ+V+Cond+Sg2: tundõkst
    tundõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tundõks
    tundõ+V+Cond+Pl1: tundõksmõ
    tundõ+V+Cond+Pl2: tundõkstõ
    tundõ+V+Cond+Pl3: tundõkstõ
    tundõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: tundõks
    tundõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: tundõksmõ
    tundõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: tundõkstõ
    tundõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: tundõkstõ
    tundõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tund
    tundõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tund
    tundõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tundõgid
    tundõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: tundõgid
    tundõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tundõg
    tundõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: tundõg
    tundõ+V+Jus+Pl3: tundõgõd
    tundõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: tundõgõd
    tundõ+V+Quo+Sg3: tundiji
    tundõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: tundiji
    tundõ+V+Quo+Pl3: tundijid
    tundõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: tundijid
    tundõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: tundõn
    tundõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: tundõnd
    tundõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: tundtõd
    tundõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: tundtõb
    tundõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tundiji
    tundõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tundimi
    
#"V_48":{"tips":"48","vards":"oudõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"V","loc":{
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Inf: oudõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ger: oudõs
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Sup: oudõm
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Deb: oudõmõst
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ōdõb
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ōdõd
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ōdõb
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: oudõm
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oudõt
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oudõbõd
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ōdiz
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ōdizt
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ōdiz
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ōdizmõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ōdizt, ōdiztõ]
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ōdizt, ōdiztõ]
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: oud
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: oudõm
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: oudõt
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: oudõt
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Sg1: oudõks
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Sg2: oudõkst
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Sg3: oudõks
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Pl1: oudõksmõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Pl2: oudõkstõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Pl3: oudõkstõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: oudõks
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: oudõksmõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: oudõkstõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: oudõkstõ
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Imprt+Sg2: oud
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: oud
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Imprt+Pl2: oudõgid
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: oudõgid
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Jus+Sg3: oudõg
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: oudõg
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Jus+Pl3: oudõgõd
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: oudõgõd
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Quo+Sg3: oudiji
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: oudiji
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Quo+Pl3: oudijid
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: oudijid
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: oudõn
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: oudõnd
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: oudtõd
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: oudtõb
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: oudiji
    oudõ+Hom1+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: oudimi
    
#"V_49":{"tips":"49","vards":"kūlõ","vcount":"169","bloks":"V","loc":{
    kūlõ+V+Inf: kūlõ
    kūlõ+V+Ger: kūlõs
    kūlõ+V+Sup: kūlõm
    kūlõ+V+Deb: kūlõmõst
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kūlõb
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kūlõd
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kūlõb
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kūlõm
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kūlõt
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kūlõbõd
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kūliz
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kūlizt
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kūliz
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kūlizmõ
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kūlizt, kūliztõ]
    kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kūlizt, kūliztõ]
    kūlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kūl
    kūlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: kūlõm
    kūlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: kūlõt
    kūlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: kūlõt
    kūlõ+V+Cond+Sg1: kūlõks
    kūlõ+V+Cond+Sg2: kūlõkst
    kūlõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kūlõks
    kūlõ+V+Cond+Pl1: kūlõksmõ
    kūlõ+V+Cond+Pl2: kūlõkstõ
    kūlõ+V+Cond+Pl3: kūlõkstõ
    kūlõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: kūlõks
    kūlõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: kūlõksmõ
    kūlõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: kūlõkstõ
    kūlõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: kūlõkstõ
    kūlõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kūl
    kūlõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kūl
    kūlõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kūlõgid
    kūlõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: kūlõgid
    kūlõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kūlõg
    kūlõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: kūlõg
    kūlõ+V+Jus+Pl3: kūlõgõd
    kūlõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: kūlõgõd
    kūlõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kūliji
    kūlõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: kūliji
    kūlõ+V+Quo+Pl3: kūlijid
    kūlõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: kūlijid
    kūlõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: kūlõn
    kūlõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: kūlõnd
    kūlõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kūldõd
    kūlõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: kūldõb
    kūlõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: kūliji
    kūlõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: kūlimi
    
#"V_50":{"tips":"50","vards":"arrõ","vcount":"29","bloks":"V","loc":{
    arrõ+V+Inf: arrõ
    arrõ+V+Ger: arrõs
    arrõ+V+Sup: arrõm
    arrõ+V+Deb: arrõmõst
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arrõb
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: arrõd
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arrõb
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: arrõm
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: arrõt
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: arrõbõd
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: arriz
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: arrizt
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: arriz
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: arrizmõ
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [arrizt, arriztõ]
    arrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [arrizt, arriztõ]
    arrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ar
    arrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: arrõm
    arrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: arrõt
    arrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: arrõt
    arrõ+V+Cond+Sg1: arrõks
    arrõ+V+Cond+Sg2: arrõkst
    arrõ+V+Cond+Sg3: arrõks
    arrõ+V+Cond+Pl1: arrõksmõ
    arrõ+V+Cond+Pl2: arrõkstõ
    arrõ+V+Cond+Pl3: arrõkstõ
    arrõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: arrõks
    arrõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: arrõksmõ
    arrõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: arrõkstõ
    arrõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: arrõkstõ
    arrõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ar
    arrõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ar
    arrõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: arrõgid
    arrõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: arrõgid
    arrõ+V+Jus+Sg3: arrõg
    arrõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: arrõg
    arrõ+V+Jus+Pl3: arrõgõd
    arrõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: arrõgõd
    arrõ+V+Quo+Sg3: arriji
    arrõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: arriji
    arrõ+V+Quo+Pl3: arrijid
    arrõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: arrijid
    arrõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: arrõn
    arrõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: arrõnd
    arrõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: ardõd
    arrõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: ardõb
    arrõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: arriji
    arrõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: arrimi
    
#"V_51":{"tips":"51","vards":"aʼilõ","vcount":"73","bloks":"V","loc":{
    ailõ+V+Inf: aʼilõ
    ailõ+V+Ger: aʼilõs
    ailõ+V+Sup: aʼilõm
    ailõ+V+Deb: aʼilõmõst
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aʼilõb
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aʼilõd
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼilõb
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aʼilõm
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼilõt
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼilõbõd
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aʼiliz
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aʼilizt
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼiliz
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aʼilizmõ
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ]
    ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ]
    ailõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼil
    ailõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼilõm
    ailõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼilõt
    ailõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼilõt
    ailõ+V+Cond+Sg1: aʼilõks
    ailõ+V+Cond+Sg2: aʼilõkst
    ailõ+V+Cond+Sg3: aʼilõks
    ailõ+V+Cond+Pl1: aʼilõksmõ
    ailõ+V+Cond+Pl2: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Cond+Pl3: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aʼilõks
    ailõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼilõksmõ
    ailõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aʼil
    ailõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼil
    ailõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aʼilõgid
    ailõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼilõgid
    ailõ+V+Jus+Sg3: aʼilõg
    ailõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: aʼilõg
    ailõ+V+Jus+Pl3: aʼilõgõd
    ailõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼilõgõd
    ailõ+V+Quo+Sg3: aʼiliji
